Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.045

Advisory committees or councils—Travel expenses.

The secretary may appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The secretary may also appoint statewide committees or councils on such subject matters as are or come within the department's responsibilities. The committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or as the secretary may determine.

Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2018 c 58 s 43; 2006 c 265 s 106. Formerly RCW 43.215.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.